Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 2587 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1750 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Changing area” means an area in which a person may be in


various stages of undress in the presence of other individuals. The


term may include, but is not limited to, a locker room or shower


room;


2. “Coach” means a person employed by a postsecondary


institution who is involved in the teaching or training of students


participating in a postsecondary institution-sponsored athletic


activity;


3. “Covered entity” means:


a. a postsecondary institution,


b. a political subdivision in this state, and


c. a domestic violence shelter that is state operated or


state funded and provides services including food,


housing, counseling, and assistance to victims of


domestic violence or abuse and their minor dependent


children in this state;


4. “Female” shall have the same meaning as provided for in


Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. “Male” shall have the same meaning as provided for in


Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 2587 Page 2


6. “Multiple occupancy” means an area designed to be used by


more than one individual at a time;


7. “Postsecondary institution” means an institution of higher


education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education or a


technology center school district operating under the authority of


the State Board of Career and Technology Education;


8. “Postsecondary institution-sponsored athletic activity”


means a sporting event that is supported by and affiliated with a


postsecondary institution such as practices, games, matches, and


tournaments;


9. “Restroom” means a room that includes one or more toilets or


urinals;


10. “Sex” shall have the same meaning as provided for in


Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


11. “Sleeping quarters” means a room containing a bed and in


which more than one individual is housed overnight.


B. Each multiple occupancy changing room and restroom in a


covered entity shall be designated for the exclusive use of the male


sex or the exclusive use of the female sex. No individual shall


enter a changing room or restroom in a covered entity unless it


corresponds to the individual’s sex.


C. Covered entities shall take reasonable steps to provide


individuals with privacy in changing areas, restrooms, and sleeping


quarters from individuals of the opposite sex.

Req. No. 2587 Page 3


D. The provisions of this section shall not apply to an


individual who enters a changing area, restroom, or sleeping


quarters designated for the opposite sex in any of the following


circumstances, provided that the changing area, restroom, or


sleeping quarters is not in use:


1. For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes;


2. To render medical assistance;


3. To render assistance by law enforcement;


4. To provide services or render aid during a natural disaster,


a declared emergency, or when necessary to prevent a serious threat


to good order or safety; or


5. If a suitable meeting room or area is not available, a coach


may enter a changing area or sleeping quarters before, during, or


after a postsecondary institution-sponsored athletic activity,


provided:


a. all students present are fully clothed,


b. the coach shall be accompanied by at least one


additional adult at all times, and


c. if the coach is the opposite sex of the students


present, the coach shall be accompanied by at least


one adult of the same sex as the students present.


The accompanying adult shall not be a student.


E. 1. During any activity or event authorized by a


postsecondary institution during which students share sleeping

Req. No. 2587 Page 4


quarters, no student shall be required to share sleeping quarters


with an individual of the opposite sex unless such person is a


member of the same family, such as a parent, legal guardian,


sibling, or grandparent.


2. In any other setting or facility on the campus of a


postsecondary institution where an individual may be in a state of


undress in the presence of others, postsecondary institution


personnel shall provide separate, private areas designated for use


by persons based on their sex. Except as provided in subsection D


of this section, no individual shall enter such setting or facility


unless he or she is a member of the same sex.


F. An institution of higher education within The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education that offers housing for students shall


provide the option to be housed only with persons of the same sex.


G. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a


covered entity from:


1. Adopting policies necessary to accommodate persons protected


under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, young children in


need of assistance, or elderly persons requiring aid;


2. Establishing restrooms, changing areas, or sleeping quarters


for single occupancy or family use; or


3. Redesignating a multiple occupancy restroom, changing room,


or sleeping quarters designated for the exclusive use of one sex to


the exclusive use of the opposite sex.

Req. No. 2587 Page 5


H. 1. An individual who accesses a covered entity’s restroom


or changing area designated for the exclusive use of the


individual’s sex and encounters an individual of the opposite sex


shall have a cause of action against the covered entity if the


covered entity:


a. provided the individual of the opposite sex permission


to use the restroom or changing area, or


b. failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the


individual of the opposite sex from using the restroom


or changing area.


2. Except as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection E of


this section, an individual who is required by a covered entity to


share sleeping quarters with an individual of the opposite sex shall


have a cause of action against the covered entity.


3. Any cause of action brought pursuant to the provisions of


this subsection shall be initiated within two (2) years of the


incident occurring.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 323, O.S.L.


2022, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 283, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S.


Supp. 2025, Section 1-125), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-125. A. As used in this section:


1. “Female” shall have the same meaning as provided for in


Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 2587 Page 6


2. “Male” shall have the same meaning as provided for in


Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. “Sex” means the physical condition of being male or female


based on genetics and physiology, as identified on the individual’s


original birth certificate has the same meaning provided for in


Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. 4. “Multiple occupancy restroom or changing area” means an


area in a public school or public charter school building designed


or designated to be used by more than one individual at a time,


where individuals may be in various stages of undress in the


presence of other individuals. The term may include, but is not


limited to, a school restroom, locker room, changing room, or shower


room;


3. 5. “Coach” means a person employed by a public school


district or public charter school who is involved in the teaching or


training of students participating in a school-sponsored athletic


activity; and


4. 6. “School-sponsored athletic activity” means a sporting


event that is supported by and affiliated with the school such as


practices, games, matches, and tournaments; and


7. “Sleeping quarters” means a room containing a bed and in


which more than one individual is housed overnight.


B. To ensure privacy and safety, each public school and public


charter school that serves students in prekindergarten through

Req. No. 2587 Page 7


twelfth grades in this state shall require every multiple occupancy


restroom or, changing area, and sleeping quarters designated as


follows:


1. For the exclusive use of the male sex; or


2. For the exclusive use of the female sex.


C. Each public school or public charter school in this state


shall provide a reasonable accommodation to any individual who does


not wish to comply with the provisions of subsection B of this


section. A reasonable accommodation shall be access to a single-


occupancy restroom or, changing room, or sleeping quarters.


D. 1. During any activity or event authorized by a public


school or public charter school where students share sleeping


quarters, no student shall be required to share sleeping quarters


with a member of the opposite sex unless such person or persons are


members of the same family, such as a parent, legal guardian,


sibling, or grandparent.


2. In any other facility or setting in a public school or


public charter school where a person may be in a state of undress in


the presence of others, public school and public charter school


personnel shall provide separate, private areas designated for use


by persons based on their sex. Except as provided for in subsection


E of this section, no person shall enter such private areas unless


he or she is a member of the sex allowed to use such private areas.



Req. No. 2587 Page 8


E. The provisions of this section shall not apply to


individuals entering a multiple occupancy restroom or, changing


area, or sleeping quarters designated for use by the opposite sex


when entering in any of the following circumstances:


1. For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes;


2. To render emergency medical assistance; or


3. To provide services or render aid during a natural disaster,


a declared emergency, or when necessary to prevent a serious threat


to good order or safety; or


4. If a suitable meeting room or area is not available, a coach


may enter a locker room before, during, or after a school-sponsored


athletic activity, provided:


a. all students present are fully clothed,


b. the coach shall be accompanied by at least one


additional adult at all times, and


c. if the coach is the opposite sex of the students


present, the coach shall be accompanied by at least


one adult of the same sex as the students present.


The adult shall not be a current high school student.


E. F. 1. Each school district board of education and public


charter school governing board shall adopt a policy to provide


disciplinary action for individuals who refuse to comply with the


provisions of this section.



Req. No. 2587 Page 9


2. No school district board of education or charter school


governing board shall adopt a policy contrary to the provisions of


this section.


F. G. Upon a finding of noncompliance with the provisions of


subsections B, C, and D, and E of this section by the State Board of


Education, the noncompliant school district or public charter school


shall receive a five percent (5%) decrease in state funding for the


school district or public charter school for the fiscal year


following the year of noncompliance.


G. H. A parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in and


physically attending a public school district or public charter


school shall have a cause of action against the public school


district or public charter school for noncompliance with the


provisions of subsections B, C, and D, and E of this section.


H. I. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2587 EB 1/15/2026 9:44:25 AM



Req. No. 2587 Page 10